Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4086.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin LOCAL CAMPAIGN FINANCE REPORTING STUDY AND PILOT PROJECT; REPORT.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Feasibility study. new text end new text begin The Campaign Finance and Public Disclosure Board must study the feasibility of permitting candidates for local office to use the board's reporting software to organize and track contributions, expenditures, and other data necessary to file reports required by Minnesota Statutes, chapter 211A. The study may assume that a candidate's obligation to file reports with the appropriate local filing officer will remain unchanged and that the board will have no jurisdiction over the candidate's activities or compliance with the reporting requirements. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Pilot project. new text end new text begin As part of the study required by this section, the board must conduct a pilot project that permits candidates in at least four local jurisdictions conducting a general election in 2026 to use the software. The jurisdictions selected must include at least one county election, one city election, and one school district election, and at least half of the jurisdictions must be located outside of the seven-county metropolitan area. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Required report. new text end new text begin The board must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over elections describing the results of the study, and any associated recommendations, no later than March 15, 2027. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end